North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 5. Privileges.

Rule 501.
General rule.

Except as otherwise required by the Constitution of the United States, the privileges of a witness, person, government, state, or political subdivision thereof shall be determined in accordance with the law of this State.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule differs from Fed. R. Evid. 501. After reviewing rules on privilege proposed by the Supreme Court, Congress rejected the proposal and substituted a rule that applies the common law of privileges in federal civil and criminal cases. In civil actions in which state law supplies the rule of decision, the state law on privileges applies.

The Uniform Rules of Evidence (1974) adopted the federal draft and several states have modeled their privilege laws on the federal draft. However, there is not a great deal of uniformity among the federal courts and various states with respect to privileges. Adoption of the federal draft would modify and delete privileges currently recognized in North Carolina and add other privileges currently not recognized in North Carolina.

Because of the extensive effort needed to clarify this confused area, the Committee decided not to draft new rules of privilege at this time but to continue the present statutory and common law system. See generally
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 54

et seq.

(1982).

Cross References.

As to privileged communications, see

G.S. 8-53

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Case for a Federal Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege that Protects Patient Identity,” see 6 Duke L.J. Rev. 1217 (1985).

For article, “Too High a Price for Truth: The Exception to the Attorney-Client Privilege for Contemplated Crimes and Frauds,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 443 (1986).

For article, “Recent Developments: Mortal Clients, Immortal Privilege? In re Death of Miller and the Future of the Posthumous Attorney-Client Privilege in North Carolina,” 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2095 (2003).